pr11.dix
<dictionary>
<alphabet>
abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
</alphabet>
<sdefs>
<sdef n="pn" c="cat=pronoun"/>
<sdef n="m" c="gender=masculine"/>
<sdef n="f" c="gender=feminine"/>
<sdef n="o" c="gender=other"/>
<sdef n="sg" c="number=singular"/>
<sdef n="pl" c="number=plural"/>
<sdef n="nom" c="case=nominative"/>
<sdef n="acc" c="case=accusative"/>
<sdef n="ins" c="case=instrumental"/>
<sdef n="dat" c="case=dative"/>
<sdef n="abl" c="case=ablative"/>
<sdef n="gen" c="case=genitive"/>
<sdef n="loc" c="case=locative"/>
<sdef n="voc" c="case=vocative"/>
</sdefs>
<pardefs>
<pardef n="n/Anu_pn">
        <e><p>
                <l>Anu</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>Avu</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>annannu</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ammannu</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>anniMxa</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ammiMxa</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>anageV</l>
				<r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>anagAgi</l>
				<r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>anagoskara</l>
				<r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>amageV</l>
				<r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
                <l>amagAgi</l>
				<r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>amagoskara</l>
				<r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>anna deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>anniMxa</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>amma deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ammiMxa</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>anna</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>amma</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>annalli</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ammalli</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>Ane</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>Ave</l>
                <r>Anu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="n/Inu_pn">
        <e><p>
                <l>Inu</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>Ivu</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>innannu</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>immannu</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>inniMxa</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>immiMxa</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>inageV</l>
				<r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>inagAgi</l>
				<r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>inagoskara</l>
				<r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>imageV</l>
				<r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>imagAgi</l>
				<r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>imagoskara</l>
				<r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>inna deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>inniniMxa</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>imma deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>immiMxa</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>inna</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>imma</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>innalli</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>immalli</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>Ine</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>Ive</l>
                <r>Inu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="nAnu"><i>n</i><par n="n/Anu_pn"/></e>
<e lm="nInu"><i>n</i><par n="n/Inu_pn"/></e>
